Washington statutes.
RCW 36.22.050

Issuance of warrants—Multiple warrants.

For claims allowed by the county commissioners, and also for cost bills and other lawful claims duly approved by the competent tribunal designated by law for their allowance, he or she shall draw a warrant on the county treasurer, made payable to the claimant or his or her order, bearing date from the time of and regularly numbered in the order of their issue. If there is not sufficient cash in the county treasury to cover such claims or cost bills, or if a claimant requests, the auditor may issue a number of smaller warrants, the total principal amounts of which shall equal the amount of said claim or cost bill.

[ 2009 c 549 s 4025; 1975 c 31 s 1; 1969 ex.s. c 87 s 1; 1963 c 4 s 36.22.050. Prior: (i) 1893 c 119 s 1, part; Code 1881 s 2710, part; 1869 p 310 s 5, part; 1863 p 549 s 5, part; 1854 p 425 s 5, part; RRS s 4086, part. (ii) 1893 c 48 s 2; RRS s 4087.]